Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB385.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3702(b) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3702. Alimony pendente lite, counsel fees and expenses.* * *(b) Exception.--Except where the court finds that an order for alimony pendente lite or spousal support is necessary to prevent manifest injustice, a party who has been convicted of committing a personal injury crime against the other party shall not be entitled to spousal support or alimony pendente lite. In determining whether manifest injustice exists, the court shall review whether there is a history of harassment by a party or a history of any protection from abuse order against a party. Any amount paid by the injured party after the commission of the 12345678910111213141516171819 offense but before the conviction of the other party shall be recoverable by the injured party upon petition.Section 2. The amendment of 23 Pa.C.S. § 3702(b) shall apply to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0385PN0342 - 2 - 123456